Utah statutes.
78B-19-116.   Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C.A. Sec. 7001 et seq. (2009), but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C.A. Sec. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Sec. 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C.A. Sec. 7003(b).

